src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
## Verb inflection
The Klingon language verbs inflect in persons with obligatory prefixes, then
the verb stem and all the optional suffixes..

* Verb prefixes examples:*
* *jIQong* `1Sg+Qong+V` (Eng. I sleep)
* *cholegh* `Sg2+Sg1O+legh+V` (Eng. you see me)

Reflexive suffixes mark reflexive forms
€gt-norm: Verb reflexives
jIlegh’egh 1Sg+legh+V+Refl I see myself
maleghchuq 1Pl+legh+V+Reciproc we see each other

Volition is a marker for volition:
€gt-norm: verb volition
€ leghnIS 3Sg+legh+V+Foc/nIs he sees nIS

Change is marked by suffixes
€gt-norm: Verbal  change
€ jIleghchoh 1Sg+legh+V+Foc/choh I see choh

Cause is marked
€gt-norm: Verbal cause
€ leghmoH 3Sg+legh+V+Caus cause him see

definiteness is just a suffix
€gt-norm: verbal definiteness
€ leghlu’ 3Sg+legh+V+Foc/lu’ he sees lu’

qualification the suffix

* verbal qualifications examples:*
* *leghchu’* `3Sg+legh+V+Foc/chu` (Eng. he sees chu’)

Aspects are coded in suffixes

* Verbal aspects examples:*
* *leghpu’* `3Sg+legh+V+Perf` (Eng. he finished seeing)

Verbs can have honorific markers

* Verbal honorifics examples:*
* *leghneS* `3Sg+legh+V+Honor` (Eng. he sees honorably)

And some other markers too

* Verb others examples:*
* *leghDI’* `3Sg+legh+V+Foc/DI’` (Eng. he sees DI’)
Verbs can always be derived into nouns with wI’:

* Deverbal nominals examples:*
* *leghwI’* `3Sg+legh+V+V→N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. his seeing)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-tlh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
